Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 1. General Provisions

Cited

in

Stevens v. Rock Springs Nat'l Bank, 577 P.2d 1374,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 286

(Wyo. 1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Recovery of compensatory damages for mental anguish or emotional distress for breach of contract to lend money, 52 ALR4th 826.

§ 40-14-301.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as “Uniform Consumer Credit Code — Loans.”

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-101; W.S. 1957, §

40-3-101

.

Cross references. —

As to territorial application, see §

40-14-120

.

§ 40-14-302.
Scope; license required.

This article applies to consumer loans.

Unless a person is a supervised financial organization or has first obtained a license from the administrator, no person shall engage in the business of making consumer loans or taking assignments of non-servicing rights relating to consumer loans that are not in default.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-102; W.S. 1957, §

40-3-102

; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021,added "; license required" in the section heading; added the (a) designation and deleted "including supervised loans; in addition part 6 applies to consumer related loans" at the end; and added (b).

When assumption of loan not “consumer loan.” —

The assumption of a loan on a mobile home by a husband and wife who intend to repair and resell the mobile home is not a consumer loan within the meaning of § 40-14-304(a); and thus, pursuant to this section, this chapter is not applicable to the assumption. Anderson v. Rocky Mountain Fed. Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 651 P.2d 269,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 385

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 40-14-303.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply to this act and appear in this article as follows:

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 2.

“Consumer loan” — W.S.

40-14-304

;

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 14, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 2.

“Lender” — W.S. 40-14-307(a);

“Loan” — W.S.

40-14-306

;

“Loan finance charge” — W.S.

40-14-309

;

“Loan primarily secured by an interest in land” - W.S.

40-14-304

(c);

“Precomputed” — W.S. 40-14-307(b);

“Principal” — W.S. 40-14-307(c);

“Revolving loan account” — W.S.

40-14-308

;

and (xiii) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 14, § 3.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-103; W.S. 1957, §

40-3-103

; 2008, ch. 116, §§ 1, 2; 2021 ch. 14, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

repealed (a)(i) which defined “annual percentage rate,” and (a)(iv) which defined “corresponding nominal annual percentage rate,” and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2021 amendments —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "40-14-304(c)" for "40-14-305" in (a)(viii).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (a)(iii), which read, "'Consumer related loan' — W.S. 40-14-355(a);"; repealed (a)(xii), which read, "'Supervised lender' — W.S. 40-14-341(b);"; and repealed (a)(xii), which read, "'Supervised loan' — W.S. 40-14-341(a)."

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

§ 40-14-304.
Definition of “consumer loan”; interests in land.

Except with respect to a loan primarily secured by an interest in land, “consumer loan” is a loan made by a person regularly engaged in the business of making loans in which:

The debtor is a person other than an organization;

The debt is incurred primarily for a personal, family or household purpose;

Either the debt is payable in installments or a loan finance charge is made; and

The principal does not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000.00).

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 2.

“Loan primarily secured by an interest in land” means a loan made for the purpose of purchasing or acquiring ownership of land and appurtenances, including structures affixed to the land, and which is secured by a first mortgage lien. A loan primarily secured by an interest in land is not a consumer loan, except that W.S.

40-14-320

,

40-14-323

,

40-14-354

and

40-14-520

through

40-14-524

shall apply to loans primarily secured by an interest in land.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-104; W.S. 1957, §

40-3-104

; Laws 1975, ch. 167, § 1; 1979, ch. 117, § 1; 1981, ch. 147, §§ 1, 2; 1996, ch. 86, § 2; 2009, ch. 184, § 2; 2013 ch. 124, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “a dwelling, as defined in W.S. 40-14-640(a)(iv), located in Wyoming” for “by personal property used or expected to be used as the principal dwelling place of the debtor” in (a)(iv).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000.00)” for “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)” in (a)(iv).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the section heading, added "interests in land" and made a related change; in (a)(iv), deleted "Either" at the beginning, "or the debt is secured by an interest in land or a dwelling, as defined in W.S. 40-14-640(a)(iv), located in Wyoming" at the end and made related changes; and added (c).

When assumption of loan not “consumer loan.” —

The assumption of a loan on a mobile home by a husband and wife who intend to repair and resell the mobile home is not a consumer loan within the meaning of subsection (a); and thus, pursuant to §

40-14-302

, this chapter is not applicable to the assumption. Anderson v. Rocky Mountain Fed. Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 651 P.2d 269,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 385

(Wyo. 1982).

Debt incurred primarily to establish business not consumer loan. —

Debt which was “incurred primarily” for the purpose of entering a mail route business and not “for a personal, family or household purpose” was not a consumer loan, even though part of the proceeds of the loan were used to pay off a second mortgage on borrower's residence, as prudent lending practice would require such pay off with transfer of the collateral if the loan were made for the purpose of financing another enterprise. Anderson v. Foothill Indus. Bank, 674 P.2d 232,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “business or commercial” purpose within meaning of § 104(1) of Truth in Lending Act (15 USC § 1603(1)), exempting business or commercial credit transactions from act, 54 ALR Fed 491.

§ 40-14-305.
Loan primarily secured by an interest in land; definitions; limited to first mortgage loan. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-105; W.S. 1957, §

40-3-105

; Laws 1975, ch. 167, § 1; 1979, ch. 117, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-14-306.
Definition of “loan”.

“Loan” includes:

The creation of debt by the lender’s payment of or agreement to pay money to the debtor or to a third party for the account of the debtor;

The creation of debt by a credit to an account with the lender upon which the debtor is entitled to draw immediately;

The creation of debt pursuant to a lender credit card or similar arrangement; and

The forbearance of debt arising from a loan.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-106; W.S. 1957, §

40-3-106

; Laws 1982, ch. 29, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of usury laws to transaction characterized as “leases,” 94 ALR3d 640.

§ 40-14-307.
Additional definitions.

Except as otherwise provided, “lender” includes an assignee of the lender’s right to payment but use of the term does not in itself impose on an assignee any obligation of the lender with respect to events occurring before the assignment.

A loan, refinancing, or consolidation is “precomputed” if the debt is expressed as a sum comprising the principal and the amount of the loan finance charge computed in advance.

“Principal” of a loan means the total of:

The net amount paid to, receivable by, or paid or payable for the account of the debtor;

The amount of any discount excluded from the loan finance charge (W.S. 40-14-309(b)); and

To the extent that payment is deferred:

Amounts actually paid or to be paid by the lender for registration, certificate of title or license fees if not included in paragraph (i) of this subsection; and

Additional charges permitted by this article (W.S.

40-14-311

).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-107; W.S. 1957, §

40-3-107

.

§ 40-14-308.
Definition of “revolving loan account”.

“Revolving loan account” means an arrangement between a lender and a debtor pursuant to which:

The lender may permit the debtor to obtain loans from time to time;

The unpaid balances of principal and the loan finance and other appropriate charges are debited to an account;

A loan finance charge if made is not precomputed but is computed on the outstanding unpaid balances of the debtor’s account from time to time; and

Either the debtor has the privilege of paying in full or in installments or the lender periodically imposes charges computed on the account for delaying payment and permits the debtor to continue to obtain loans.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-108; W.S. 1957, §

40-3-108

; Laws 1982, ch. 29, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 40-14-309.
Definition of “loan finance charge”.

“Loan finance charge” means the sum of:

All charges payable directly or indirectly by the debtor and imposed directly or indirectly by the lender as a condition of or an incident to the extension of credit, including any of the following types of charges which are applicable: interest or any amount payable under a point, discount, or other system of charges, however denominated, premium or other charge for any guarantee or insurance protecting the lender against the debtor’s default or other credit loss; and

Charges incurred for investigating the collateral or credit-worthiness of the debtor or for commissions or brokerage for obtaining the credit, irrespective of the person to whom the charges are paid or payable, unless the lender had no notice of the charges when the loan was made.

The term does not include charges as a result of default, additional charges (W.S.

40-14-311

), delinquency charges (W.S.

40-14-312

), deferral charges (W.S.

40-14-313

) or reasonable credit application fees whether or not credit is extended.

If a lender makes a loan to a debtor by purchasing or satisfying obligations of the debtor pursuant to a lender credit card or similar arrangement, and the purchase or satisfaction is made at less than the face amount of the obligation, the discount is not part of the loan finance charge.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-109; W.S. 1957, §

40-3-109

; Laws 1982, ch. 29, § 2; 2013 ch. 124, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “a condition of or” following “by the lender as” in (a)(i).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Lender's Labyrinth and the Banker's Burden: The Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974 and the 1975 Amendments,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 383 (1976).